Utah statutes.
54-3-26.   Retention of unclaimed capital credits by electric and telephone
cooperatives -- Use of retained monies -- Reporting requirements.
Each electric and telephone cooperative shall:
(1)  retain capital credits given to customers of electric and telephone
cooperatives in this state that remain unclaimed for a period of three years
after the end the year in which the credit is given;
(2)  use the monies retained solely to:
(a)  assist low-income persons to pay their utility bills; and
(b)  provide scholarships to local graduating high school seniors;
(3)  establish guidelines based on factors such as income or special needs to
determine persons who qualify; and
(4)  submit copies annually to the Public Service Commission of:
(a)  the cooperative's guidelines; and
(b)  amounts and disposition of retained capital credits by individual
recipients.
